Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.689

Child care—Public access to reports and enforcement action notices.

(1) Every child day care center, outdoor nature-based child care provider, and family day care provider shall have readily available for review by the department, parents, and the public a copy of each inspection report and notice of enforcement action received by the center or provider from the department for the past three years. This subsection only applies to reports and notices received on or after July 24, 2005.

(2) The department shall make available to the public during business hours all inspection reports and notices of enforcement actions involving child day care centers, outdoor nature-based child care providers, and family day care providers. The department shall include in the inspection report a statement of the corrective measures taken by the center or provider.

(3) The department may make available on a publicly accessible website all inspection reports and notices of licensing actions, including the corrective measures required or taken, involving child day care centers, outdoor nature-based child care providers, and family day care providers.

(4) This section shall not be construed to require the disclosure of any information that is exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2021 c 304 s 25; 2007 c 415 s 7; 2006 c 209 s 12; 2005 c 473 s 5. Formerly RCW 43.215.530, 74.15.330.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2005 c 473: See note following RCW 74.15.300.